Washington statutes.
RCW 19.174.050

Lighting requirements.

The operator, owner, or other person responsible for an automated teller machine or night deposit facility shall provide lighting during hours of darkness with respect to an open and operating automated teller machine or night deposit facility and a defined parking area, access area, and the exterior of an enclosed automated teller machine or night deposit facility installation according to the following standards:

(1) There must be a minimum of ten candle-foot power at the face of the automated teller machine or night deposit facility and extending in an unobstructed direction outward five feet;

(2) There must be a minimum of two candle-foot power within fifty feet from all unobstructed directions from the face of the automated teller machine or night deposit facility. In the event the automated teller machine or night deposit facility is located within ten feet of the corner of the building and the automated teller machine or night deposit facility is generally accessible from the adjacent side, there must be a minimum of two candle-foot power along the first forty unobstructed feet of the adjacent side of the building; and

(3) There must be a minimum of two candle-foot power in that portion of the defined parking area within fifty feet of the automated teller machine or night deposit facility.

[ 1993 c 324 s 5.]